Massachusetts, session 194th, H1746.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 97B1/2 of chapter 41 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking out section (b)(2) and replacing it with:- 
(2) Submit new sexual assault evidence kits to the crime laboratory within the department 
of the state police or the police department of a municipality that operates a crime laboratory and 
has a population of more than 150,000, in the case of a sexual assault alleged to have taken place 
in that municipality, within 7 business days of taking possession. A sexual violence survivor/ 
victim who has not yet filed a report with law enforcement may elect their sexual assault 
evidence kit to be tested. Alternatively, a survivor/victim may elect their kit to be safely stored 
by law enforcement in a manner that preserves evidence for the duration of the statute of 
limitations for all sexual assault and rape cases. 
SECTION 2. Section 97B1/2 of chapter 41 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
adding subsection (e):-  

of 2 13  (e) A survivor of sexual assault has the right not to have the results of the rape kit used to 
prosecute the survivor/victim. Law enforcement agencies and their agents shall use 
survivor/victim DNA samples or profiles only for purposes directly related to the incident being 
investigated. No law enforcement agency or agent thereof may compare any of these 
survivor/victim samples or profiles with DNA samples or profiles that do not relate to the 
incident being investigated. No law enforcement agency or agent thereof may include any of 
these survivor/victim DNA profiles in any database that allows these samples to be compared to 
or matched with profiles derived from DNA evidence obtained from crime scenes.